California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) Coalinga State Hospital shall be used whenever a person is committed to a secure facility for mental health treatment pursuant to this article and is placed in a state hospital under the direction of the State Department of State Hospitals unless there are unique circumstances that would preclude the placement of a person at that facility. If a state hospital is not used, the facility to be used shall be located on a site or sites determined by the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the Director of State Hospitals. In no case shall a person committed to a secure facility for mental health treatment pursuant to this article be placed at Metropolitan State Hospital or Napa State Hospital.

(b) The State Department of State Hospitals shall be responsible for operation of the facility, including the provision of treatment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 138.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6600.1.

If the victim of an underlying offense that is specified in subdivision (b) of Section 6600 is a child under the age of 14, the offense shall constitute a “sexually violent offense” for purposes of Section 6600.

(History: Amended November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 83, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

6601.

(a) (1) When the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation determines that an individual who is in custody under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, who is either serving a determinate prison sentence or whose parole has been revoked, and who is not in custody for the commission of a new offense committed while the individual was serving an indeterminate term in a state hospital as a sexually violent predator, may be a sexually violent predator, the secretary shall, at least six months prior to that individual’s scheduled date for release from prison, refer the person for evaluation in accordance with this section. However, if the inmate was received by the department
 with less than nine months of their sentence to serve, or if the inmate’s release date is modified by judicial or administrative action, the secretary may refer the person for evaluation in accordance with this section at a date that is less than six months prior to the inmate’s scheduled release date.

(2) When an individual is in custody under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation for the commission of a new offense committed while the individual was serving an indeterminate term in a state hospital as a sexually violent predator, the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall, at least six months prior to the individual’s scheduled date for release from prison, refer the person directly to the State Department of State Hospitals for a full evaluation of whether the person
 still meets the criteria in Section 6600. However, if the inmate was received by the department with less than nine months of their sentence to serve, or if the inmate’s release date is modified by judicial or administrative action, the secretary may refer the person for evaluation in accordance with this section at a date that is less than six months prior to the inmate’s scheduled release date. The evaluation shall be conducted in accordance with subdivisions (c) to (g), inclusive. If both evaluators concur that the person has a diagnosed mental disorder so that the person is likely to engage in acts of sexual violence without appropriate treatment and custody, the Director of State Hospitals shall forward a request for
 a court order no less than 20 calendar days prior to the scheduled release date of the person to the county designated in subdivision (i) authorizing a transfer of the individual from the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to the State Department of State Hospitals to continue serving the remainder of the individual’s original indeterminate commitment as a sexually violent predator if the original petition has not been dismissed. If the petition has previously been dismissed, the Director of State Hospitals shall forward a request for a new petition to be filed for commitment to the county designated in subdivision (i) no less than 20 calendar days prior to the scheduled release date of the person consistent with subdivision (d). 

(3) A petition may be filed under this section if the individual was in custody pursuant to a
 determinate prison term, parole revocation term, or a hold placed pursuant to Section 6601.3, at the time the petition is filed. A petition shall not be dismissed on the basis of a later judicial or administrative determination that the individual’s custody was unlawful, if the unlawful custody was the result of a good faith mistake of fact or law. This paragraph applies to any petition filed on or after January 1, 1996.

(b) The person shall be screened by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the Board of Parole Hearings based on whether the person has committed a sexually violent predatory offense and on a review of the person’s social, criminal, and institutional history. This screening shall be conducted in accordance with a structured screening instrument developed and updated by the State Department of State
 Hospitals in consultation with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. If as a result of this screening it is determined that the person is likely to be a sexually violent predator, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall refer the person to the State Department of State Hospitals for a full evaluation of whether the person meets the criteria in Section 6600.

(c) The State Department of State Hospitals shall evaluate the person in accordance with a standardized assessment protocol, developed and updated by the State Department of State Hospitals, to determine whether the person is a sexually violent predator as defined in this article. The standardized assessment protocol shall require assessment of diagnosable mental disorders, as well as various factors known to be associated with the risk of reoffense among sex
 offenders. Risk factors to be considered shall include criminal and psychosexual history, type, degree, and duration of sexual deviance, and severity of mental disorder.

(d) Pursuant to subdivision (c), the person shall be evaluated by two practicing psychiatrists or psychologists, or one practicing psychiatrist and one practicing psychologist, designated by the Director of State Hospitals. If both evaluators concur that the person has a diagnosed mental disorder so that the person is likely to engage in acts of sexual violence without appropriate treatment and custody, the Director of State Hospitals shall forward a request for a petition for commitment under Section 6602 to the county designated in subdivision (i). Copies of the evaluation reports and any other supporting documents shall be made available to the attorney designated by the
 county pursuant to subdivision (i) who may file a petition for commitment.

(e) If one of the professionals performing the evaluation pursuant to subdivision (d) does not concur that the person meets the criteria specified in subdivision (d), but the other professional concludes that the person meets those criteria, the Director of State Hospitals shall arrange for further examination of the person by two independent professionals selected in accordance with subdivision (g).

(f) If an examination by independent professionals pursuant to subdivision (e) is conducted, a petition to request commitment under this article shall only be filed if both independent professionals who evaluate the person pursuant to subdivision (e) concur that the person meets the criteria for
 commitment specified in subdivision (d). The professionals selected to evaluate the person pursuant to subdivision (g) shall inform the person that the purpose of their examination is not treatment but to determine if the person meets certain criteria to be involuntarily committed pursuant to this article. It is not required that the person appreciate or understand that information.

(g) An independent professional who is designated by the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or the Director of State Hospitals for purposes of this section shall not be a state government employee, shall have at least five years of experience in the diagnosis and treatment of mental disorders, and shall include psychiatrists and licensed psychologists who have a doctoral degree in psychology. The requirements set forth in this section
 also shall apply to professionals appointed by the court to evaluate the person for purposes of any other proceedings under this article.

(h) (1) If the State Department of State Hospitals determines that the person is a sexually violent predator as defined in this article, the Director of State Hospitals shall forward a request for a petition to be filed for commitment under this article to the county designated in subdivision (i) no less than 20 calendar days prior to the scheduled release date of the person. Copies of the evaluation reports and any other supporting documents shall be made available to the attorney designated by the county pursuant to subdivision (i) who may file a petition for commitment in the superior court.

(2) If a hold is placed pursuant to
 Section 6601.3 and the State Department of State Hospitals determines that the person is a sexually violent predator as defined in this article, the Director of State Hospitals shall forward a request for a petition to be filed for commitment under this article to the county designated in subdivision (i) no less than 20 calendar days prior to the end of the hold.

(3) The person shall have no right to enforce the time limit set forth in this subdivision and shall have no remedy for its violation.

(i) If the county’s designated counsel concurs with the recommendation, a petition for commitment shall be filed in the superior court of the county in which the person was convicted of the offense for which the person was committed to the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections
 and Rehabilitation. The petition shall be filed, and the proceedings shall be handled, by either the district attorney or the county counsel of that county. A person’s subsequent conviction for an offense that is not a sexually violent offense committed while in the custody of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or the State Department of State Hospitals that occurs prior to the resolution of a petition filed pursuant to this section shall not change jurisdiction for the petition from the county in which the person was convicted of the offense for which the person was committed to the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. If a person is convicted of a subsequent sexually violent offense committed while in the custody of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or the State Department of State Hospitals that occurs prior to the resolution of a petition
 filed pursuant to this section a subsequent petition for commitment as a sexually violent predator pursuant to this section shall be filed in the superior court of the county in which the person was convicted of the subsequent sexually violent offense. The county board of supervisors shall designate either the district attorney or the county counsel to assume responsibility for proceedings under this article.

(j) An order issued by a judge pursuant to Section 6601.5, finding that the petition, on its face, supports a finding of probable cause to believe that the individual named in the petition is likely to engage in sexually violent predatory criminal behavior upon
 release, shall toll that person’s parole pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 3000 of the Penal Code, if that individual is determined to be a sexually violent predator.

(k) The attorney designated by the county pursuant to subdivision (i) shall notify the State Department of State Hospitals of its decision regarding the filing of a petition for commitment pursuant to subdivision (d) within 15 days of making that decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 383, Sec. 1.   (SB 248)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Note: Section 6601 was amended on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

6601.3.

(a) Upon a showing of good cause, the Board of Parole Hearings may order that a person referred to the State Department of State Hospitals pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 6601 remain in custody for no more than 45 days beyond the person’s scheduled release date for full evaluation pursuant to subdivisions (c) to (i), inclusive, of Section 6601.

(b) For purposes of this section, good cause means circumstances where there is a recalculation of credits or a restoration of denied or lost credits by any custodial agency or court, a resentencing by a court, the
 receipt of the prisoner into custody, or equivalent exigent circumstances
 that result in there being less than 45 days prior to the person’s scheduled release date for the full evaluation described in subdivisions (c) to (i), inclusive, of Section 6601.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 878, Sec. 2.   (AB 1906)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6601.5.

Upon filing of the petition and a request for review under this section, a judge of the superior court shall review the petition and determine whether the petition states or contains sufficient facts that, if true, would constitute probable cause to believe that the individual named in the petition is likely to engage in sexually violent predatory criminal behavior upon his or her release. If the judge determines that the petition, on its face, supports a finding of probable cause, the judge shall order that the person be detained in a secure facility until a
 hearing can be completed pursuant to Section 6602. The probable cause hearing provided for in Section 6602 shall commence within 10 calendar days of the date of the order issued by the judge pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 41, Sec. 2.   Effective June 26, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6602.

(a) A judge of the superior court shall review the petition and shall determine whether there is probable cause to believe that the individual named in the petition is likely to engage in sexually violent predatory criminal behavior upon his or her release. The person named in the petition shall be entitled to assistance of counsel at the probable cause hearing. Upon the commencement of the probable cause hearing, the person shall remain in custody pending the completion of the probable cause hearing. If the judge determines there is not probable cause, he or she shall dismiss the petition and any person subject to parole shall report to parole. If the judge determines that there is probable cause, the judge shall order that the person remain in
 custody in a secure facility until a trial is completed and shall order that a trial be conducted to determine whether the person is, by reason of a diagnosed mental disorder, a danger to the health and safety of others in that the person is likely to engage in acts of sexual violence upon his or her release from the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or other secure facility.

(b) The probable cause hearing shall not be continued except upon a showing of good cause by the party requesting the continuance.

(c) The court shall notify the State Department of State Hospitals of the outcome of the probable cause hearing by forwarding to the department a copy of the minute order of the court within 15 days of the decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 141.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6602.5.

(a) No person may be placed in a state hospital pursuant to the provisions of this article until there has been a determination pursuant to Section 6601.3 or 6602 that there is probable cause to believe that the individual named in the petition is likely to engage in sexually violent predatory criminal behavior.

(b) The State Department of State Hospitals shall identify each person for whom a petition pursuant to this article has been filed who is in a state hospital on or after January 1, 1998, and who has not had a probable cause hearing pursuant to Section 6602. The State Department of State Hospitals shall notify the court in which the petition was filed that the person has not
 had a probable cause hearing. Copies of the notice shall be provided by the court to the attorneys of record in the case. Within 30 days of notice by the State Department of State Hospitals, the court shall either order the person removed from the state hospital and returned to local custody or hold a probable cause hearing pursuant to Section 6602.

(c) In no event shall the number of persons referred pursuant to subdivision (b) to the superior court of any county exceed 10 in any 30-day period, except upon agreement of the presiding judge of the superior court, the district attorney, the public defender, the sheriff, and the Director of State Hospitals.

(d) This section shall be implemented in Los Angeles County pursuant to a letter of agreement between the Department of State Hospitals, the Los Angeles County district attorney, the Los Angeles County public defender, the Los
 Angeles County sheriff, and the Los Angeles County Superior Court. The number of persons referred to the Superior Court of Los Angeles County pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be governed by the letter of agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 142.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6603.

(a) A person subject to this article is entitled to a trial by jury, to the assistance of counsel, to the right to retain experts or professional persons to perform an examination on the person’s behalf, and to have access to all relevant medical and psychological records and reports. If the person is indigent, the court shall appoint counsel to assist that person and, upon the person’s request, assist the person in obtaining an expert or professional person to perform an examination or participate in the trial on the person’s behalf. Any right that may exist under this section to request DNA testing on prior cases shall be made in conformity with Section 1405 of the Penal Code.

(b) The
 attorney petitioning for commitment under this article has the right to demand that the trial be before a jury.

(c) To continue a trial, written notice shall be filed and served on all parties to the proceeding, together with affidavits or declarations detailing specific facts showing that a continuance is necessary.

(1) All moving and supporting papers shall be served and filed at least 10 court days before the hearing, except as provided in paragraph (2). The moving and supporting papers served shall be a copy of the papers filed or to be filed with the court.

(2) If the written notice is served by mail, the 10-day period of notice before the hearing shall be increased as follows:

(A) Five calendar days if the place of mailing and the place of address are within the State of California.

(B) Ten calendar days if either the place of mailing or the place of address is outside the State of California, but within the United
 States.

(C) Twenty calendar days if either the place of mailing or the place of address is outside the United States.

(D) Two calendar days if the notice is served by facsimile transmission, express mail, or another method of delivery providing for overnight delivery.

(3) All papers opposing a continuance motion noticed pursuant to this subdivision shall be filed with the court and a copy shall be served on each party at least four court days before the hearing. All reply papers shall be served on each party at least
 two court days before the hearing. A party may waive the right to have documents served in a timely manner after receiving actual notice of the request for continuance.

(4) If a party makes a motion for a continuance that does not comply with the requirements described in this subdivision, the court shall hold a hearing on whether there is good cause for the failure to comply with those requirements. At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall make a finding whether good cause has been shown and, if it finds that there is good cause, shall state on the record the facts proved that justify its finding. If the moving party is unable to show good cause
 for the failure to give notice, the motion for continuance shall not be granted.

(5) Continuances shall be granted only upon a showing of good cause. The court shall not find good cause solely based on the convenience of the parties or a stipulation of the parties. At the conclusion of the motion for continuance, the court shall make a finding whether good cause has been shown and, if it finds that there is good cause, shall state on the record the facts proved that justify its finding.

(6) In determining good cause, the court shall consider the general convenience and prior commitments of all witnesses. The court shall also
 consider the general convenience and prior commitments of each witness in selecting a continuance date if the motion is granted. The facts as to inconvenience or prior commitments may be offered by the witness or by a party to the case.

(7) Except as specified in paragraph (8), a continuance shall be granted only for the period of time shown to be necessary by the evidence considered at the hearing on the motion. If a continuance is granted, the court shall state on the record the facts proved that justify the length of the continuance.

(8) For purposes of this subdivision, “good cause” includes, but is not limited to, those cases in which the attorney assigned to the case has another trial or probable cause hearing in progress. A continuance granted pursuant to this subdivision as the result of another trial or hearing in progress shall not exceed 10 court days after the conclusion of that trial or hearing.

(d) (1) If the attorney petitioning for commitment under this article determines that updated evaluations are necessary in order to properly present the case for commitment, the attorney may
 request the State Department of State Hospitals to perform updated evaluations. If one or more of the original evaluators is no longer available to testify for the petitioner in court proceedings, the attorney petitioning for commitment under this article may request the State Department of State Hospitals to perform replacement evaluations. When a request is made for updated or replacement evaluations, the State Department of State Hospitals shall perform the requested evaluations and forward them to the petitioning attorney and to the counsel for the person subject to this article. However, updated or replacement evaluations shall not be performed except as necessary to update one or more of the original evaluations or to replace the evaluation of an evaluator who is no longer available to testify for the petitioner in court proceedings. These updated or replacement evaluations shall
 include review of available medical and psychological records, including treatment records, consultation with current treating clinicians, and interviews of the person being evaluated, either voluntarily or by court order. If an updated or replacement evaluation results in a split opinion as to whether the person subject to this article meets the criteria for commitment, the State Department of State Hospitals shall conduct two additional evaluations in accordance with subdivision (f) of Section 6601.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “no longer available to testify for the petitioner in court proceedings” means that the evaluator is no longer authorized by the Director of State Hospitals to perform evaluations regarding sexually violent predators as a result of any of the following:

(A) The evaluator has failed to adhere to the protocol of the State Department of State Hospitals.

(B) The evaluator’s license has been suspended or revoked.

(C) The evaluator is unavailable pursuant to Section 240 of the Evidence Code.

(D) The independent professional or state employee who has served as the evaluator has resigned or retired and has not entered into a new contract to continue as an evaluator in the case, unless this evaluator, in the evaluator’s most recent evaluation of the person subject to this article, opined that the person subject to this article does not meet the criteria for commitment.

(e) This section does not prevent the defense from
 presenting otherwise relevant and admissible evidence.

(f) If the person subject to this article or the petitioning attorney does not demand a jury trial, the trial shall be before the court without a jury.

(g) A unanimous verdict shall be required in any jury trial.

(h) The court shall notify the State Department of State Hospitals of the outcome of the trial by forwarding to the department a copy of the minute order of the court within 72 hours of the decision.

(i) This section does not limit any legal or equitable right that a person may have to request DNA testing.

(j) Subparagraph (D) of paragraph
 (2) of subdivision (d) does not affect the authority of the State Department of State Hospitals to conduct two additional evaluations when an updated or replacement evaluation results in a split opinion.

(k) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the evaluator performing an updated evaluation shall include with the evaluation a statement listing all records reviewed by the evaluator pursuant to subdivision (d). The court shall issue a subpoena, upon the request of either party, for a certified copy of these records. The records shall be provided to the attorney petitioning for commitment and the counsel for the person subject to this article. The
 attorneys may use the records in proceedings under this article and shall not disclose them for any other purpose.

(2) This subdivision does not affect the right of a party to object to the introduction at trial of all or a portion of a record subpoenaed under paragraph (1) on the ground that it is more prejudicial than probative pursuant to Section 352 of the Evidence Code or that it is not material to the issue of whether the person subject to this article is a sexually violent predator, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 6600, or to any other issue to be decided by the court. If the relief is granted, in whole or in part, the record or records shall retain any confidentiality that may apply under Section 5328 of this code and Section 1014 of the Evidence Code.

(3) This
 subdivision does not affect any right of a party to seek to obtain other records regarding the person subject to this article.

(4) Except as provided in paragraph (1), this subdivision does not affect any right of a committed person to assert that records are confidential under Section 5328 of this code or Section 1014 of the Evidence Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 606, Sec. 1.   (AB 303)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6603.3.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), no attorney may disclose or permit to be disclosed to a person subject to this article, family members of the person subject to this article, or any other person, the name, address, telephone number, or other identifying information of a victim or witness whose name is disclosed to the attorney pursuant to Section 6603 and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of Title 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure, unless specifically permitted to do so by the court after a
 hearing and showing of good cause.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an attorney may disclose or permit to be disclosed, the name, address, telephone number, or other identifying information of a victim or witness to persons employed by the attorney or to a person hired or appointed for the purpose of assisting the person subject to this article in the preparation of the case, if that disclosure is required for that preparation. Persons provided this information shall be informed by the attorney that further dissemination of the information, except as provided by this section, is prohibited.

(3) A willful violation of this subdivision by an attorney, persons employed by an attorney, or persons appointed by the court is a misdemeanor.

(b) If the person subject to this article is acting as his or her own attorney, the
 court shall endeavor to protect the name, address, telephone number, or other identifying information of a victim or witness by providing for contact only through a private investigator licensed by the Department of Consumer Affairs and appointed by the court or by imposing other reasonable restrictions, absent a showing of good cause as determined by the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 155, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

6603.5.

No employee or agent of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Board of Parole Hearings, or the State Department of State Hospitals shall disclose to any person, except to employees or agents of each named department, the prosecutor, the respondent’s counsel, licensed private investigators hired or appointed for the respondent, or other persons or agencies where authorized or required by law, the name, address, telephone number, or other identifying information of a person who was involved in a civil commitment hearing under this article as the victim of a sex offense except where authorized or required by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 67.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6603.7.

(a) Except as provided in Section 6603.3, the court, at the request of the victim of a sex offense relevant in a proceeding under this article, may order the identity of the victim in all records and during all proceedings to be either Jane Doe or John Doe, if the court finds that the order is reasonably necessary to protect the privacy of the person and will not unduly prejudice the party petitioning for commitment under this article or the person subject to this article.

(b) If
 the court orders the victim to be identified as Jane Doe or John Doe pursuant to subdivision (a), and if there is a jury trial, the court shall instruct the jury at the beginning and at the end of the trial that the victim is being so identified only for the purposes of protecting his or her privacy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 155, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

6604.

The court or jury shall determine whether, beyond a reasonable doubt, the person is a sexually violent predator. If the court or jury is not satisfied beyond a reasonable doubt that the person is a sexually violent predator, the court shall direct that the person be released at the conclusion of the term for which he or she was initially sentenced, or that the person be unconditionally released at the end of parole, whichever is applicable. If the court or jury determines that the person is a sexually violent predator, the person shall be committed for an indeterminate term to the custody of the State Department of State Hospitals for appropriate treatment and confinement in a secure facility designated by the Director of State Hospitals. The facility shall be located
 on the grounds of an institution under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 143.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

6604.1.

(a) The indeterminate term of commitment provided for in Section 6604 shall commence on the date upon which the court issues the initial order of commitment pursuant to that section.

(b) The person shall be evaluated by two practicing psychologists or psychiatrists, or by one practicing psychologist and one practicing psychiatrist, designated by the State Department of State Hospitals. The provisions of subdivisions (c) to (i), inclusive, of Section 6601 shall apply to evaluations performed for purposes of extended commitments. The rights, requirements, and procedures set forth in Section 6603 shall apply to all commitment proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 68.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

6604.9.

(a) A person found to be a sexually violent predator and committed to the custody of the State Department of State Hospitals shall have a current examination of his or her mental condition made at least once every year. The report shall be in the form of a declaration and shall be prepared by a professionally qualified person. The person may retain or, if he or she is indigent and so requests, the court may appoint, a qualified expert or professional person to examine him or her, and the expert or professional person shall have access to all records concerning the person.

(b) The annual report shall include consideration of whether the committed person currently meets the definition of a sexually violent predator and
 whether conditional release to a less restrictive alternative, pursuant to Section 6608, or an unconditional discharge, pursuant to Section 6605, is in the best interest of the person and conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the community.

(c) The State Department of State Hospitals shall file this periodic report with the court that committed the person under this article. A copy of the report shall be served on the prosecuting agency involved in the initial commitment and upon the committed person.

(d) If the State Department of State Hospitals determines that either: (1) the person’s condition has so changed that the person no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator and should, therefore, be considered for unconditional discharge, or (2) conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the person and
 conditions can be imposed that adequately protect the community, the director shall authorize the person to petition the court for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or for an unconditional discharge. The petition shall be filed with the court and served upon the prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment.

(e) The court, upon receipt of the petition for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative, shall consider the petition using procedures described in Section 6608.

(f) The court, upon receiving a petition for unconditional discharge, shall order a show cause hearing, pursuant to the provisions of Section 6605, at which the court may consider the petition and any accompanying documentation provided by the medical director, the prosecuting attorney, or the committed person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 189.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6605.

(a) (1) The court, upon receiving a petition for unconditional discharge, shall order a show cause hearing at which the court can consider the petition and any accompanying documentation provided by the medical director, the prosecuting attorney, or the committed person.

(2) If the court at the show cause hearing determines that
 probable cause exists to believe that the committed person’s diagnosed mental disorder has so changed that he or she is not a danger to the health and safety of others and is not likely to engage in sexually violent criminal behavior if discharged, then the court shall set a hearing on the issue.

(3) At the hearing, the committed person shall have the right to be present and shall be entitled to the benefit of all constitutional protections that were afforded to him or her at the initial commitment proceeding. The attorney designated by the county pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 6601 shall represent the state and shall have the right to demand a jury trial and to have the committed person evaluated by experts chosen by the state. The committed person also shall have the right to demand a jury trial and to have experts
 evaluate him or her on his or her behalf. The court shall appoint an expert if the person is indigent and requests an appointment. The burden of proof at the hearing shall be on the state to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the committed person’s diagnosed mental disorder remains such that he or she is a danger to the health and safety of others and is likely to engage in sexually violent criminal behavior if discharged. Where the person’s failure to participate in or complete treatment is relied upon as proof that the person’s condition has not changed, and there is evidence to support that reliance, the jury shall be instructed substantially as follows:

“The committed person’s failure to participate in or complete the State Department of State Hospitals Sex Offender Commitment Program (SOCP) are facts that, if proved, may be considered as evidence
 that the committed person’s condition has not changed. The weight to be given that evidence is a matter for the jury to determine.”

(b) If the court or jury rules against the committed person at the hearing conducted pursuant to subdivision (a), the term of commitment of the person shall run for an indeterminate period from the date of this ruling and the committed person may not file a new petition until one year has elapsed from the date of the ruling. If the court or jury rules for the committed person, he or she shall be unconditionally released and unconditionally discharged.

(c) If the State Department of State Hospitals has reason to believe that a person committed to it as a sexually violent predator is no longer a sexually violent predator, it shall seek judicial review of the
 person’s commitment pursuant to the procedures set forth in Section 7250 in the superior court from which the commitment was made. If the superior court determines that the person is no longer a sexually violent predator, he or she shall be unconditionally released and unconditionally discharged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 182, Sec. 2.   (SB 295)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

6606.

(a) A person who is committed under this article shall be provided with programming by the State Department of State Hospitals which shall afford the person with treatment for his or her diagnosed mental disorder. Persons who decline treatment shall be offered the opportunity to participate in treatment on at least a monthly basis.

(b) Amenability to treatment is not required for a finding that any person is a person described in Section 6600, nor is it required for treatment of that person. Treatment does not mean that the treatment be successful or potentially successful, nor does it mean that the person must recognize his or her problem and willingly participate in the treatment
 program.
